Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-505
Enterprise, defined.

Enterprise means one
or more departments, offices, boards, bureaus, commissions, or
institutions of the state for which money
is to be appropriated for communications or data processing services, equipment,
or facilities, including all executive, legislative, and judicial departments,
the Nebraska state colleges, the University of Nebraska, and all other state
institutions and entities.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 275;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 38.